Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202283-1205
Developmental disability, defined.

Developmental disability shall mean a severe, chronic disability, including an intellectual disability, other than mental illness, which:

(1) Is attributable to a mental or physical impairment unless the impairment is solely attributable to a severe emotional disturbance or persistent mental illness;

(2) Is manifested before the age of twenty-two years;

(3) Is likely to continue indefinitely;

(4) Results in substantial functional limitations in one of each of the following areas of adaptive functioning:

(a) Conceptual skills, including language, literacy, money, time, number concepts, and self-direction;

(b) Social skills, including interpersonal skills, social responsibility, self-esteem, gullibility, wariness, social problem solving, and the ability to follow laws and rules and to avoid being victimized; and

(c) Practical skills, including activities of daily living, personal care, occupational skills, health care, mobility, and the capacity for independent living; and

(5) Reflects the individual’s need for a combination and sequence of special, interdisciplinary, or generic services, individualized supports, or other forms of assistance that are of lifelong or extended duration and are individually planned and coordinated.

An individual from birth through the age of nine years inclusive who has a substantial developmental delay or specific congenital or acquired condition may be considered to have a developmental disability without meeting three or more of the major life activities described in subdivision (4) of this section if the individual, without services and support, has a high probability of meeting those criteria later in life.

Laws 1991, LB 830, § 5;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 59;

Laws 2016, LB1039, § 4.